Rhode Island, session 2025, SB588.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Title 36 of the General Laws entitled "PUBLIC OFFICERS AND
EMPLOYEES" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 17
ORGAN-DONATION LEAVE ACT
36-17-1. Short title.
This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Organ-Donation Leave Act."
36-17-2. Organ-donation leave.
(a) Eligibility. A state employee who is currently working and has successfully completed
an initial probationary period during the current employment period and worked at least one
thousand two hundred fifty (1,250) hours during the previous twelve (12) months may be eligible
for paid leave as provided in this section to donate a kidney, a liver segment, or bone marrow, and
medically recover. An eligible employee may take organ-donation leave no more than once in any
twelve (12) month period.
(b) Duration. Any organ-donation leave begins on the date of donation and ends on the
earliest of:
(1) Sixty (60) calendar days after a kidney or liver segment donation;
(2) Thirty (30) calendar days after a bone marrow donation;
(3) The date that absence to recover from the donation is no longer supported by

documentation from the employee's medical provider as medically necessary;
(4) The date of the employee's seasonal layoff, limited term appointment's expiration,
layoff after position abolishment, or separation from state service; or
(5) The date the employee returns to work.
(c) Notice. Before beginning an organ-donation leave, the employee should give as much
notice as practicable of the expected start and end date for the leave. Notice should be provided at
least thirty (30) days before the leave's expected start.
(d) Pay. An eligible full-time employee on organ-donation leave receives base pay during
the leave. An eligible less-than-full-time employee on an organ-donation leave, for each week
during the leave, receives base pay for the average number of hours scheduled each week over the
last six (6) pay periods before the leave, distributed equally Monday through Friday. Hours are
entered in payroll as administrative leave.
(e) Holidays. Paid holidays observed during a leave are recorded as paid holidays and do
not extend an organ-donation leave.
(f) Leave and accruals. An employee need not exhaust sick and annual leave before taking
organ-donation leave. An employee accrues sick and annual leave during the leave. An eligible
employee may not use any other paid leave during any organ donation leave. Time on organ-
donation leave counts toward step increases if an employee is in satisfactory standing.
(g) Coordination with other benefits. Time on organ-donation leave also counts toward any
Family and Medical Leave Act (FMLA) and unpaid medical leave entitlements.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001012
========
LC001012 - Page 2 of 3